Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-521
Tests and reports; department; duties.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall prescribe the tests, the test methods and techniques, and such reports and reporting procedures as are necessary to implement sections 71-519 to 71-524.

Laws 1987, LB 385, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 504;

Laws 2002, LB 235, § 3;

Laws 2005, LB 301, § 17;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 392.